Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 6

Reforestation

11-4-601. Reforestation program.

The division shall acquire, develop, and administer forest tree seedling nursery sites and facilities as necessary to assure the long-term production of seedlings in sufficient quantity and quality for purposes of reforestation, and shall maintain a tree improvement program to assure the continued development and production of genetically superior tree seed.

Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 30.

11-4-602. Cooperation with federal government.

The division is authorized to cooperate with the federal government in the implementation of respective reforestation and forest improvement programs, including the reclamation and stabilization of critically eroding areas and those cost share programs intended to protect and improve the productivity of forest land.

Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 31.

11-4-603. Incentive program.

The division is authorized to establish a state reforestation incentive program. The purpose of the program is to encourage the reforestation of suitable open lands, cutover, or other nonstocked or understocked forests, and severely eroding areas. Program funds will be made available to eligible landowners on a matching cost share basis. The division is hereby authorized to receive funding in the form of voluntary contributions from organizations, industry, individuals, institutions, corporations, and other private, nongovernmental bodies to be placed in the state reforestation incentive fund for use by the division in providing matching funds for purposes of implementing this section.

Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 32.

11-4-604. Implementation of incentive program.

The state forester is authorized to develop policies and procedures for implementation of the program. There are hereby authorized to be appropriated annually such sums as may be needed to implement the state reforestation incentive program.

Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 33.